Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-667.02
Districts; formation; sewer, drainage, or water systems and mains; special assessments; use of other funds.

Upon formation of a district as provided in section 16-667.01, the mayor and city council may order sewer, drainage, or water systems and mains to be laid and constructed in such district and the costs, to the extent of the special benefit, assessed against the lots and parcels of real estate in such district. The cost of sewer, drainage, or water systems or mains in excess of collections from special assessments under this section may be paid out of the sewer fund or water fund, or, if money in such fund is insufficient, out of the general fund of the city.

Laws 1977, LB 483, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 119.